zh-TW: 電極連接器類型: 2 毫米插針; 3 毫米扣式; 雙扣式; 豬尾式; 專用; 無線; 其他
it: Tipo di connettore dell'elettrodo: Pin da 2 mm; Snap da 3 mm; Doppio snap; Codino; Proprietario; Senza fili; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de conector de elétrodo: Pino de 2 mm; Encaixe de 3 mm; Encaixe duplo; Cabo flexível; Proprietário; Sem fios; Outro
nl: Type elektrodeconnector: 2 mm pin; 3 mm snap; Dubbele snap; Pigtail; Eigendom; Draadloos; Andere
ko: 전극 커넥터 유형: 2mm 핀; 3mm 스냅; 듀얼 스냅; 피그테일; 독점; 무선; 기타
ru: Тип разъема электрода: Штырь 2 мм; Кнопка 3 мм; Двойная кнопка; Гибкий провод; Фирменный; Беспроводной; Другой
nb: Elektrodetilkoblingstype: 2 mm pinne; 3 mm trykknapp; Dobbel trykknapp; Pigtail; Privateid; Trådløs; Annet
de: Elektrodenanschlussart: 2 mm Stift; 3 mm Druckknopf; Doppel-Druckknopf; Anschlusskabel; Proprietär; Kabellos; Sonstiges
hu: Elektródacsatlakozó típusa: 2 mm-es csatlakozó; 3 mm-es pattintós; Dupla pattintós; Pigtail; Szabadalmazott; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
tr: Elektrot konektör türü: 2 mm pin; 3 mm çıtçıt; Çift çıtçıt; Kıvrık kablo; Tescilli; Kablosuz; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta konektora elektrode: Pin od 2 mm; Pritisni gumb od 3 mm; Dvostruki pritisni gumb; Pigtail; Vlasnički; Bežična; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip conector electrod: Pin de 2 mm; Clips de 3 mm; Clips dublu; Conector tip coadă; Proprietate; Fără fir; Altele
sk-SK: Typ konektora elektródy: 2 mm kolík; 3 mm cvočok; Dvojitý cvočok; Pigtail; Vlastnícke; Bezdrôtový; Iné
pl: Typ złącza elektrody: Wtyk 2 mm; Zatrzask 3 mm; Podwójny zatrzask; Warkoczyk; Własny; Bezprzewodowy; Inne
fi: Elektrodin liittimen tyyppi: 2 mm:n tappi; 3 mm:n napsuliitin; Kaksosnapsuliitin; Piuhaliitin; Valmistajakohtainen; Langattomat; Muu
es: Tipo de conector de electrodo: Pin de 2 mm; Broche de 3 mm; Broche doble; Coleta; Patentado; Inalámbrico; Otros
sv: Elektrodkopplingstyp: 2 mm stift; 3 mm tryckknapp; Dubbel tryckknapp; Svansanslutning; Proprietär; Trådlös; Övrigt
fr: Type de connecteur d’électrode: Broche de 2 mm; Bouton-pression de 3 mm; Double bouton-pression; Queue de cochon; Propriétaire; Sans fil; Autre
cs: Typ konektoru elektrody: 2 mm kolík; 3 mm západka; Dvojitá západka; Pigtail; Vlastní; Bezdrátové; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип конектор за електрод: 2 мм щифт; 3 мм щракване; Двойно щракване; Опашка; Собствено; Безжичен; Други
da: Elektrodeforbindelsestype: 2 mm stik; 3 mm trykknap; Dobbelt trykknap; Ledningsslange; Navnebeskyttet; Trådløs; Andet
vi: Loại đầu nối điện cực: Chân cắm 2 mm; Khóa bấm 3 mm; Khóa bấm kép; Đuôi heo; Độc quyền; Không dây; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka elektrod: 2 mm zatič; 3 mm pritisk; Dvojni pritisk; Pigtail; Lastniški standard; Brezžično; Drugo
lt-LT: Elektrodo jungties tipas: 2 mm kaištis; 3 mm spragtukas; Dvigubas spragtukas; Kabelio atšaka; Patentuotas; Belaidis; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de conector de eletrodo: Pino de 2 mm; Encaixe de 3 mm; Encaixe duplo; Tipo rabicho; Proprietário; Sem fio; Outro
th: ประเภทขั้วต่ออิเล็กโทรด: พินขนาด 2 มม.; แบบสแนปขนาด 3 มม.; แบบสแนปคู่; แบบหางหมู; กรรมสิทธิ์; แบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος συνδέσμου ηλεκτροδίου: Ακίδα 2 mm; Κούμπωμα 3 mm; Διπλό κούμπωμα; Καλώδιο pigtail; Ιδιοταγής; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 电极连接器类型: 2 毫米插针; 3 毫米按扣; 双按扣; 尾线式; 专有标准; 无线; 其他
en: Electrode connector type: 2 mm pin; 3 mm snap; Dual-snap; Pigtail; Proprietary; Wireless; Other
ja: 電極コネクタータイプ: 2mmピン; 3mmスナップ; デュアルスナップ; ピッグテール; 独自の; 無線; その他